California, session 20252026, AB326.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 89045.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:89045.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law or financial audit of the California State University, an external financial audit of each campus of the California State University shall be conducted at least once every three years.(b) All audits of the California State University or any campus of the California State University, including audits conducted pursuant to Section 89045 and audits conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be available to the public.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 1. REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________